Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 3. Fair Credit Reporting

§ 2480a.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter and subchapter 10 of this chapter:

“Consumer” means a natural person other than a protected consumer.

“Consumer who is subject to a protected consumer security freeze” means a natural person:

for whom a credit reporting agency placed a security freeze under section 2480h of this title; and

who, on the day on which a request for the removal of the security freeze is submitted under section 2480h of this title, is not a protected consumer.

“Credit report” means any written, oral, or other communication of any information by a credit reporting agency bearing on a consumer’s credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living, including an investigative credit report. The term does not include:

a report containing information solely as to transactions or experiences between the consumer and the person making the report; or

an authorization or approval of a specific extension of credit directly or indirectly by the issuer of a credit card or similar device.

“Credit reporting agency” or “agency” means a person who, for fees, dues, or on a cooperative basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating information concerning a consumer’s credit or other information for the purpose of furnishing a credit report to another person.

“File” shall have the same meaning as in

15 U.S.C. § 1681a

.

“Identity theft” means the unauthorized use of another person’s personal identifying information to obtain credit, goods, services, money, or property.

“Incapacitated person” shall have the same meaning as in

14 V.S.A. § 3152

.

“Investigative credit report” means a report in which information on a consumer’s character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living is obtained through personal interviews with neighbors, friends, or associates of the consumer reported on or with others with whom the consumer is acquainted or who may have knowledge concerning any such items of information. The term does not include reports of specific factual information on a consumer’s credit record obtained directly from a creditor of the consumer or from a credit reporting agency when such information was obtained directly from a creditor of the consumer or from the consumer.

“Personal information” means personally identifiable financial information:
(9) (A) “Personal information” means personally identifiable financial information:

provided by a consumer to another person;

resulting from any transaction with the consumer or any service performed for the consumer; or

otherwise obtained by another person.

“Personal information” does not include:

publicly available information, as that term is defined by the regulations prescribed under 15 U.S.C. § 6804; or

any list, description, or other grouping of consumers and publicly available information pertaining to the consumers that is derived without using any nonpublic personal information.

Notwithstanding subdivision (B) of this subdivision (9), “personal information” includes any list, description, or other grouping of consumers and publicly available information pertaining to the consumers that is derived using any nonpublic personal information other than publicly available information.

“Proper authority” means:

in the case that it is required of a protected consumer’s representative:

sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer;

sufficient proof of identification of the protected consumer’s representative; and

sufficient proof of authority to act on behalf of the protected consumer; and

in the case that it is required of a consumer who is subject to a protected consumer security freeze:

sufficient proof of identification of the consumer who is subject to a protected consumer security freeze; and

proof that the consumer who is subject to a protected consumer security freeze is not a protected consumer.

“Proper identification” shall have the same meaning as in

15 U.S.C. § 1681h

(a)(1), and includes:

the consumer’s full name, including first, last, and middle names and any suffix;

any name the consumer previously used;

the consumer’s current and recent full addresses, including street address, any apartment number, city, state, and zip code;

the consumer’s Social Security number; and

the consumer’s date of birth.

“Protected consumer” means a natural person who, at the time a request for a security freeze is made, is:

under 16 years of age;

an incapacitated person; or

a protected person.

“Protected consumer security freeze” means:

if a consumer reporting agency does not have a file that pertains to a protected consumer, a restriction that:

is placed on the protected consumer’s record in accordance with this subchapter; and

except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, prohibits the consumer reporting agency from releasing the protected consumer’s record; or

if a consumer reporting agency has a file that pertains to the protected consumer, a restriction that:

is placed on the protected consumer’s credit report in accordance with this subchapter; and

except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, prohibits the consumer reporting agency from releasing the protected consumer’s credit report or any information derived from the protected consumer’s credit report.

“Protected person” shall have the same meaning as in

14 V.S.A. § 3152

.

“Record” means a compilation of information that:

identifies a protected consumer;

is created by a consumer reporting agency solely for the purpose of complying with this section; and

may not be created or used to consider the protected consumer’s credit worthiness, credit standing, credit capacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics, or mode of living.

“Representative” means a person who provides to a consumer reporting agency sufficient proof of authority to act on behalf of a protected consumer.

“Security freeze” means a notice placed in a credit report, at the request of the consumer, pursuant to section 2480h of this title.

“Sufficient proof of authority” means documentation that shows that a person has authority to act on behalf of a protected consumer, including:

a birth certificate;

a court order;

a lawfully executed power of attorney; or

a written, notarized statement signed by the person that expressly describes the person’s authority to act on behalf of the protected consumer.

“Sufficient proof of identification” means information or documentation that identifies a protected consumer or a representative, including:

a Social Security number or a copy of a Social Security card issued by the U.S. Social Security Administration;

a certified or official copy of a birth certificate; or

a copy of a government-issued driver’s license or identification card.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2005;

2005, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2017, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 2019;

2019, No. 57

, § 21.

§ 2480b.
Disclosures to consumers.

A credit reporting agency shall, upon request and proper identification of any consumer, clearly and accurately disclose to the consumer all information available to users at the time of the request pertaining to the consumer, including:

any credit score or predictor relating to the consumer, in a form and manner that complies with such comments or guidelines as may be issued by the Federal Trade Commission;

the names of users requesting information pertaining to the consumer during the prior 12-month period and the date of each request; and

a clear and concise explanation of the information.

in response to a court order;

for direct mail offers of credit;

if you have given ongoing permission and you have an existing relationship with the person requesting a copy of your credit report;

where the request for a credit report is related to an education loan made, guaranteed, or serviced by the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation;

where the request for a credit report is by the Office of Child Support when investigating a child support case;

where the request for a credit report is related to a credit transaction entered into prior to January 1, 1993; or

where the request for a credit report is by the Vermont Department of Taxes and is used for the purpose of collecting or investigating delinquent taxes.

(3)

If you believe a law regulating consumer credit reporting has been violated, you may file a complaint with the Vermont Attorney General’s Consumer Assistance Program, 104 Morrill Hall, University of Vermont, Burlington, Vermont 05405.

Click to view

You have a right to place a “security freeze” on your credit report pursuant to

9 V.S.A. § 2480h

at no charge. The security freeze will prohibit a credit reporting agency from releasing any information in your credit report without your express authorization. A security freeze must be requested in writing by certified mail.

The security freeze is designed to help prevent credit, loans, and services from being approved in your name without your consent. However, you should be aware that using a security freeze to take control over who gains access to the personal and financial information in your credit report may delay, interfere with, or prohibit the timely approval of any subsequent request or application you make regarding new loans, credit, mortgage, insurance, government services or payments, rental housing, employment, investment, license, cellular phone, utilities, digital signature, Internet credit card transaction, or other services, including an extension of credit at point of sale.

When you place a security freeze on your credit report, within ten business days you will be provided a personal identification number, password, or other equally or more secure method of authentication to use if you choose to remove the freeze on your credit report or authorize the release of your credit report for a specific party, parties, or period of time after the freeze is in place. To provide that authorization, you must contact the credit reporting agency and provide all of the following:

As frequently as new telephone directories are published, the credit reporting agency shall cause to be listed its name and number in each telephone directory published to serve communities of this State. In accordance with rules adopted by the Attorney General, the credit reporting agency shall make provision for consumers to request by telephone the information required to be disclosed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section at no cost to the consumer.

Any time a credit reporting agency is required to make a written disclosure to consumers pursuant to

15 U.S.C. § 1681g

, it shall disclose, in at least 12-point type, and in bold type as indicated, the following notice:

Click to view

(2)

Under Vermont law, no one may access your credit report without your permission except under the following limited circumstances:

The unique personal identification number, password, or other method of authentication provided by the credit reporting agency.

Proper identification to verify your identity.

The proper information regarding the third party or parties who are to receive the credit report or the period of time for which the report shall be available to users of the credit report.

A credit reporting agency may not charge a fee to remove the freeze on your credit report or authorize the release of your credit report for a specific party, parties, or period of time after the freeze is in place.

A credit reporting agency that receives a request from a consumer to lift temporarily a freeze on a credit report shall comply with the request no later than three business days after receiving the request.

A security freeze will not apply to “preauthorized approvals of credit.” If you want to stop receiving preauthorized approvals of credit, you should call [INSERT PHONE NUMBERS] [ALSO INSERT ALL OTHER CONTACT INFORMATION FOR PRESCREENED OFFER OPT-OUT.]

A security freeze does not apply to a person or entity, or its affiliates, or collection agencies acting on behalf of the person or entity with which you have an existing account that requests information in your credit report for the purposes of reviewing or collecting the account, provided you have previously given your consent to this use of your credit reports. Reviewing the account includes activities related to account maintenance, monitoring, credit line increases, and account upgrades and enhancements.

You have a right to bring a civil action against someone who violates your rights under the credit reporting laws. The action can be brought against a credit reporting agency or a user of your credit report.”

The information required to be disclosed by this section shall be disclosed in writing. The information required to be disclosed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall be disclosed on one side of a separate document, with text no smaller than that prescribed by the Federal Trade Commission for the notice required under

15 U.S.C. § 1681g

. The information required to be disclosed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section may accurately reflect changes in numerical items that change over time (such as the telephone number or address of Vermont State agencies) and remain in compliance.

The Attorney General may revise this required notice by rule as appropriate from time to time, provided no new substantive rights are created.

“NOTICE TO VERMONT CONSUMERS (1) Under Vermont law, you are allowed to receive one free copy of your credit report every 12 months from each credit reporting agency. If you would like to obtain your free credit report from [INSERT NAME OF COMPANY], you should contact us by [[writing to the following address: [INSERT ADDRESS FOR OBTAINING FREE CREDIT REPORT]] or [calling the following number: [INSERT TELEPHONE NUMBER FOR OBTAINING FREE CREDIT REPORT]], or both].

Vermont Consumers Have the Right to Obtain a Security Freeze

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 3

, § 1, eff. April 9, 1993;

1997, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2003, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 2005;

2005, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2017, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 22, 2018;

2021, No. 20

, § 21.

§ 2480c.
Charges for certain disclosures by credit reporting agencies.

A credit reporting agency shall not impose a charge for:

providing the information required to be disclosed under subsection 2480b(a) of this title, once every 12 months;

providing the notice required under subsection 2480d(g) of this title (notice of results of reinvestigation); or

notifying any person designated by the consumer pursuant to

15 U.S.C. § 1681i

of the deletion of information that is found to be inaccurate or that can no longer be verified.

For all other disclosures to consumers of information available to users pertaining to the consumer the credit reporting agency may impose a reasonable charge, not to exceed $7.50, on the consumer.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2480d.
Procedure in case of disputed accuracy.

If the completeness or accuracy of any item of information contained in the consumer’s file is disputed by the consumer and the consumer notifies the credit reporting agency directly of such dispute, the agency shall reinvestigate free of charge and record the current status of the disputed information on or before 30 business days after the date the agency receives notice from the consumer.

On or before five business days after the date a credit reporting agency receives notice of a dispute from a consumer in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, the agency shall provide notice of the dispute to all persons who provided any item of information in dispute.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a credit reporting agency may terminate a reinvestigation of information disputed by a consumer under such subsection if the agency reasonably determines that such dispute by the consumer is frivolous or irrelevant. Upon making such a determination, a credit reporting agency shall promptly notify the consumer of such determination and the reasons therefor, by mail, or if authorized by the consumer for that purpose, by telephone. The presence of contradictory information in the consumer’s file does not in and of itself constitute reasonable grounds for determining the dispute is frivolous or irrelevant.

In conducting a reinvestigation under subsection (a) of this section, the credit reporting agency shall review and consider all relevant information submitted by the consumer with respect to such disputed information.

If, after a reinvestigation under subsection (a) of this section of any information disputed by a consumer, the information is found to be inaccurate or cannot be verified, the credit reporting agency shall promptly delete such information from the consumer’s file. For purposes of this section, “information” shall not include other information in the same item that is not disputed by the consumer.

If any information is deleted after a reinvestigation under subsection (a) of this section, the information may not be reinserted in the consumer’s file after deletion unless the person who furnishes the information reinvestigates and states in writing or by electronic record to the agency that the information is complete and accurate. Such furnisher shall not provide such statement unless the furnisher reasonably believes that the information is complete and accurate. Upon such reinvestigation and statement by the furnisher, the credit reporting agency shall promptly notify the consumer of any reinsertion.

A credit reporting agency shall provide written notice of the results of any reinvestigation under this subsection within five business days of the completion of the reinvestigation, by mail or, if authorized by the consumer for that purpose, by telephone. This notice shall include:

a statement that the reinvestigation is complete;

a statement of the determination of the agency on the completeness or accuracy of the disputed information;

a credit report that is based upon the consumer’s file as that file is revised as a result of the reinvestigation;

a description of the manner in which the information disputed by the consumer has been altered, changed, deleted, or modified in the consumer’s credit report;

a description of the procedure used to determine the accuracy and completeness of the information, including the name, business address, and, if available, the telephone number of any person contacted in connection with such information; and

a notification that the consumer has the right, pursuant to

15 U.S.C. § 1681i

, to add a statement to the consumer’s file disputing the accuracy or completeness of the information.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2480e.
Consumer consent.

A person shall not obtain the credit report of a consumer unless:

the report is obtained in response to the order of a court having jurisdiction to issue such an order; or

the person has secured the consent of the consumer, and the report is used for the purpose consented to by the consumer.

Credit reporting agencies shall adopt reasonable procedures to ensure maximum possible compliance with subsection (a) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect:

the ability of a person who has secured the consent of the consumer pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section to include in his or her request to the consumer permission to also obtain credit reports, in connection with the same transaction or extension of credit, for the purpose of reviewing the account, increasing the credit line on the account, for the purpose of taking collection action on the account, or for other legitimate purposes associated with the account; and

the use of credit information for the purpose of prescreening, as defined and permitted from time to time by the Federal Trade Commission.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2480f.
Violations.

A violation of this subchapter or rules adopted under this subchapter is deemed to be a violation of section 2453 of this title. This section shall not be construed to limit a credit reporting agency’s liability under any other law.

A consumer aggrieved by a violation of this subchapter or rules adopted under this subchapter may bring an action in Superior Court for the consumer’s damages, injunctive relief, punitive damages in the case of a willful violation, and reasonable costs and attorney’s fees. In the case of a violation by a credit reporting agency, or in the case of a willful violation by any person, the court, in addition, may issue an award for the consumer’s actual damages or $100.00, whichever is greater. In considering the amount of punitive damages, the court may consider, among other relevant factors:

the extent to which a credit reporting agency failed to consider relevant information provided by the consumer during any reinvestigation of information in the consumer’s file; and

the extent to which a credit reporting agency maintained and complied with procedures designed to ensure compliance with the requirements of this subchapter.

The Attorney General has the same authority to make rules, conduct civil investigations, and bring civil actions with respect to any alleged violations of this subchapter as is provided under subchapter 1 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2480g.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to education loans made, guaranteed, or serviced by the Vermont Student Assistance Corporation pursuant to 16 V.S.A. chapter 87.

The provisions of section 2480e of this title shall not apply to the Office of Child Support services when investigating a child support case pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act and

33 V.S.A. § 4102

.

The provisions of section 2480e of this title shall not apply to credit transactions entered into prior to January 1, 1993.

The provisions of section 2480e of this title shall not apply to the Department of Taxes, its agents, or assigns:

where the Department has reason to believe that the taxpayer is liable for delinquent taxes, and the Department is seeking the taxpayer’s credit report in furtherance of the investigation or collection of such delinquent taxes; or

where the Department is seeking the taxpayer’s credit report in furtherance of the collection of a debt owed by the taxpayer to the State of Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 50

, § 1, eff. June 26, 1997.

§ 2480h.
Security freeze by credit reporting agency; time in effect.

A Vermont consumer may place a security freeze on his or her credit report. A credit reporting agency shall not charge a fee to Vermont consumers for placing or removing, removing for a specific party or parties, or removing for a specific period of time after the freeze is in place, a security freeze on a credit report.
(a) (1) A Vermont consumer may place a security freeze on his or her credit report. A credit reporting agency shall not charge a fee to Vermont consumers for placing or removing, removing for a specific party or parties, or removing for a specific period of time after the freeze is in place, a security freeze on a credit report.

A consumer may place a security freeze on his or her credit report by making a request in writing by certified mail to a credit reporting agency.

A security freeze shall prohibit, subject to the exceptions in subsection (l) of this section, the credit reporting agency from releasing the consumer’s credit report or any information from it without the express authorization of the consumer.

This subsection does not prevent a credit reporting agency from advising a third party that a security freeze is in effect with respect to the consumer’s credit report.

A credit reporting agency shall place a security freeze on a consumer’s credit report not later than five business days after receiving a written request from the consumer.

The credit reporting agency shall send a written confirmation of the security freeze to the consumer within 10 business days and shall provide the consumer with a unique personal identification number or password, other than the customer’s Social Security number, or another method of authentication that is equally or more secure than a PIN or password, to be used by the consumer when providing authorization for the release of his or her credit for a specific party, parties, or period of time.

If the consumer wishes to allow his or her credit report to be accessed for a specific party, parties, or period of time while a freeze is in place, he or she shall contact the credit reporting agency, request that the freeze be temporarily lifted, and provide the following:

proper identification;

the unique personal identification number, password, or other method of authentication provided by the credit reporting agency pursuant to subsection (c) of this section; and

the proper information regarding the third party, parties, or time period for which the report shall be available to users of the credit report.

A credit reporting agency may develop procedures involving the use of telephone, fax, the Internet, or other electronic media to receive and process a request from a consumer to lift temporarily a freeze on a credit report pursuant to subsection (d) of this section in an expedited manner.

A credit reporting agency that receives a request from a consumer to lift temporarily a freeze on a credit report pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall comply with the request not later than three business days after receiving the request.

A credit reporting agency shall remove or lift temporarily a freeze placed on a consumer’s credit report only in the following cases:

Upon consumer request, pursuant to subsection (d) or (j) of this section.

If the consumer’s credit report was frozen due to a material misrepresentation of fact by the consumer. If a credit reporting agency intends to remove a freeze upon a consumer’s credit report pursuant to this subdivision, the credit reporting agency shall notify the consumer in writing prior to removing the freeze on the consumer’s credit report.

If a third party requests access to a credit report on which a security freeze is in effect and this request is in connection with an application for credit or any other use and the consumer does not allow his or her credit report to be accessed for that specific party or period of time, the third party may treat the application as incomplete.

If a consumer requests a security freeze pursuant to this section, the credit reporting agency shall disclose to the consumer the process of placing and lifting temporarily a security freeze and the process for allowing access to information from the consumer’s credit report for a specific party, parties, or period of time while the security freeze is in place.

A security freeze shall remain in place until the consumer requests that the security freeze be removed. A credit reporting agency shall remove a security freeze within three business days of receiving a request for removal from the consumer who provides both of the following:

proper identification; and

the unique personal identification number, password, or other method of authentication provided by the credit reporting agency pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

A credit reporting agency shall require proper identification of the person making a request to place or remove a security freeze.

The provisions of this section, including the security freeze, do not apply to the use of a consumer report by the following:

A person, or the person’s subsidiary, affiliate, agent, or assignee with which the consumer has or, prior to assignment, had an account, contract, or debtor-creditor relationship for the purposes of reviewing the account or collecting the financial obligation owing for the account, contract, or debt, or extending credit to a consumer with a prior or existing account, contract, or debtor-creditor relationship, subject to the requirements of section 2480e of this title. For purposes of this subdivision, “reviewing the account” includes activities related to account maintenance, monitoring, credit line increases, and account upgrades and enhancements.

A subsidiary, affiliate, agent, assignee, or prospective assignee of a person to whom access has been granted under subsection (d) of this section for purposes of facilitating the extension of credit or other permissible use.

Any person acting pursuant to a court order, warrant, or subpoena.

The Office of Child Support when investigating a child support case pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.) and

33 V.S.A. § 4102

.

The Economic Services Division of the Department for Children and Families or the Department of Vermont Health Access or its agents or assignee acting to investigate welfare or Medicaid fraud.

The Department of Taxes, municipal taxing authorities, or the Department of Motor Vehicles, or any of their agents or assignees, acting to investigate or collect delinquent taxes or assessments, including interest and penalties, unpaid court orders, or acting to fulfill any of their other statutory or charter responsibilities.

A person’s use of credit information for the purposes of prescreening as provided by the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act.

Any person for the sole purpose of providing a credit file monitoring subscription service to which the consumer has subscribed.

A credit reporting agency for the sole purpose of providing a consumer with a copy of his or her credit report upon the consumer’s request.

Any property and casualty insurance company for use in setting or adjusting a rate or underwriting for property and casualty insurance purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2005; amended

2005, No. 174

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2005, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 4;

2009, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § I.15;

2017, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 22, 2018.

§ 2480i.
Credit reporting agency duties if security freeze in place.

If a security freeze is in place, a credit reporting agency shall not change any of the following official information in a credit report without sending a written confirmation of the change to the consumer within 30 days of the change being posted to the consumer’s file: name, date of birth, Social Security number, and address. Written confirmation is not required for technical modifications of a consumer’s official information, including name and street abbreviations, complete spellings, or transposition of numbers or letters. In the case of an address change, the written confirmation shall be sent to both the new address and the former address.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2005.

§ 2480j.
Persons not required to place security freeze.

The following persons are not required to place in a credit report a security freeze pursuant to section 2480h of this title; provided, however, that any person that is not required to place a security freeze on a credit report under the provisions of subdivision (3) of this section shall be subject to any security freeze placed on a credit report by another credit reporting agency from which it obtains information:

A check services or fraud prevention services company, which reports on incidents of fraud or issues authorizations for the purpose of approving or processing negotiable instruments, electronic fund transfers, or similar methods of payment.

A deposit account information service company, which issues reports regarding account closures due to fraud, substantial overdrafts, ATM abuse, or similar negative information regarding a consumer to inquiring banks or other financial institutions for use only in reviewing a consumer request for a deposit account at the inquiring bank or financial institution.

A credit reporting agency that:

acts only to resell credit information by assembling and merging information contained in a database of one or more credit reporting agencies; and

does not maintain a permanent database of credit information from which new credit reports are produced.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2005.

§ 2480k.
Complaints to law enforcement agencies.

A person who has learned or reasonably suspects that his or her personal identifying information has been unlawfully used by another, as described in

13 V.S.A. § 2030(a)

, may make a complaint about the unlawful use of personal identifying information to the State Police or to the person’s local law enforcement agency. The law enforcement agency shall take the complaint and provide the complainant with a copy of the complaint, the name of the law enforcement officer taking the complaint, and an incident number or case number assigned to the complaint by the law enforcement agency. If the suspected crime was committed in a different jurisdiction, the law enforcement agency shall take the complaint and provide the complainant with a copy of the complaint, the name of the law enforcement officer taking the complaint, and an incident number or case number assigned to the complaint by the law enforcement agency and refer the complaint to a law enforcement agency in that different jurisdiction.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2005.

§ 2480
l
.
Verification of change of consumer’s address for preapproved offers of credit.

A credit card issuer that mails an offer or solicitation to receive a credit card and, in response, receives a completed application for a credit card that lists an address that is substantively different from the address on the offer or solicitation shall make a commercially reasonable attempt to verify the change of address, which may include checking addresses on other open accounts.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2005.

§ 2480m.
Limitations on use of Social Security numbers.

Prior to posting or requiring the posting of a document in a place of general public circulation, an agency, board, department, commission, committee, branch, instrumentality, or authority of the State, or an agency, board, committee, department, branch, instrumentality, commission, or authority of any political subdivision of the State shall take all reasonable steps to redact any Social Security numbers from the document. Files and records made available to the public in accordance with and pursuant to

24 V.S.A. § 1165

are not considered posted in a place of general public circulation for the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2005.

§ 2480n.
Credit report files of deceased persons.

An executor, administrator, or other person authorized to act on behalf of an estate of a deceased person may request that a credit reporting agency indicate on the deceased person’s credit reporting file that the person is deceased. The credit reporting agency shall indicate on the deceased person’s credit reporting file that the person is deceased within five business days of receipt of the following documentation from the executor, administrator, or other person authorized to act on behalf of the estate of the deceased person:

a certificate of death, or a certificate of appointment, letters testamentary, or other order from the Probate Division of the Superior Court authorizing the executor, administrator, or other person to act on behalf of the estate of the deceased person; and

a request to indicate on the deceased person’s credit reporting file that the person is deceased.

The credit reporting agency may remove the indication placed on the person’s file pursuant to subsection (a) of this section if the credit reporting agency finds that the indication was placed on the person’s file through material misrepresentation of fact. If the credit reporting agency intends to remove the indication pursuant to this subsection, the credit reporting agency shall notify the executor, administrator, or other person authorized to act on behalf of the estate in writing prior to removing the indication.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 2005; amended

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238a, eff. Feb. 1, 2011.